Louisiana, session 2026, HB1204.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:827.3(A)(2)(d) and 951(C) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§827.3. Savings attributable to criminal justice reforms; data collection and
reporting requirements to the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget
A.
* * *
(2) Each fiscal year, the annual savings shall be allocated as follows:
* * *
(d) Fifteen percent shall be allocated to the Louisiana Children's Trust Fund
Board Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of juvenile justice, to
administer and operate the Back on Track Youth Pilot Program as provided in R.S.
15:951.
* * *
§951. Back on Track Youth Pilot Program
* * *
C.(1) This program shall be administered by selected nonprofit groups as
well as the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of juvenile justice,
the Department of Children and Family Services, the Department of Education, and
Louisiana Works, and the Louisiana Children's Trust Fund Board.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1204 ENROLLED
(2) The Louisiana Children's Trust Fund Board Department of Public Safety
and Corrections, office of juvenile justice, is hereby named as the intermediary of the
program with the authority to manage or administer funds and address any changes
in program funding as needed.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.